New York, session 2025-2026, A5351.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 376 of the laws of 2024 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the county of Chenango to impose an 3 additional mortgage recording tax, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after shall it 5 have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed December 31, 6 [2025] 2027. 7 § 2. Paragraphs (p) and (q) of subdivision 1 of section 261 of the tax 8 law, paragraph (p) as amended by chapter 479 of the laws of 2022 and 9 paragraph (q) as amended by chapter 365 of the laws of 2005, are amended 10 and a new paragraph (r) is added to read as follows: 11 (p) with respect to the remaining counties of the state except Catta- 12 raugus county which have not suspended the imposition of such additional 13 tax pursuant to subdivision two of section two hundred fifty-three of 14 this article, to the comptroller to be paid by [him or her] them into 15 the general fund in the state treasury to the credit of the state 16 purposes account; provided that money paid to the comptroller with 17 respect to any such remaining county in which on the date of such 18 payment any mass transportation, airport or aviation, municipal historic 19 site, municipal park, community mental health and developmental disabil- 20 ities facility, or sewage treatment capital project is being carried out 21 by a municipality with state aid, or for which state aid will be paid, 22 pursuant to the provisions of title one of chapter seven hundred seven- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08409-02-5 A. 5351 2 1 teen of the laws of nineteen hundred sixty-seven, section 17.05 of the 2 parks, recreation and historic preservation law, section 41.18 of the 3 mental hygiene law, or section 17-1903 of the environmental conservation 4 law, shall be applied by [him or her] them to increase the amount of aid 5 for which the state is obligated in respect to such project on such 6 date, provided that any such increase in state aid may not, together 7 with any federal funds paid or to be paid on account of the cost of such 8 project, exceed the total cost thereof, and where more than one such 9 capital project is being carried out on such date within such county, 10 the application of such monies by the comptroller shall be pro-rated 11 among such municipalities on the basis of the respective amounts of 12 state aid which are so obligated on such date; [and] (q) with respect to 13 the county of Cattaraugus, to the comptroller to be paid by [him or her] 14 them into the general fund in the state treasury to the credit of the 15 state purposes account for the construction of a county office building 16 and a county department of public works office building, or debt service 17 thereon being carried out by the county of Cattaraugus up to but not 18 exceeding the total cost for such county office building and county 19 department of public works building, or debt service thereon less the 20 amount of any state aid or federal funds paid or to be paid on account 21 of such project or debt service thereon[.]; and (r) with respect to the 22 county of Chenango, to the county treasurer of such county for deposit 23 into the general fund of the county of Chenango. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.